Tennessee, session 114, HB1856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2109(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(11) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2), a conventional or Class D
school bus that is used exclusively to transport students from school to an after-school
program may be used until the bus reaches the twentieth year from the in-service date of
the bus, or until the bus accumulates three hundred thousand (300,000) miles of
recorded travel, whichever occurs later. After the bus reaches the later of twenty (20)
years of service or three hundred thousand (300,000) miles of recorded travel, the owner
of the bus may continue to operate the bus throughout the remainder of the school year,
but at the conclusion of the school year the owner must discontinue use of, or replace,
the bus. The bus must meet all requirements for its continued safe use and operation
during the remainder of the school year, and the owner of the bus shall notify the
department of safety in writing, via certified mail, that the bus has reached twenty (20)
years of service or three hundred thousand (300,000) miles of recorded travel.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2109(b)(4), is amended by
deleting ", but not more than eighteen (18) years from such date,".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1856
011150
- 1 -